Hawaii, session 2026, HB1527.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the stadium development district established for aloha stadium is intended to support public benefit uses, including athletics and community events, and that gambling is inconsistent with the State's long-standing public policy against casino gambling. The legislature further finds that private developers may speculate on the future legalization of gambling in Hawaii, potentially affecting financing assumptions and community expectations for state projects.  The legislature affirms that gambling shall be prohibited on any part of the new aloha stadium development district. The legislature additionally finds that gambling enterprises can threaten the integrity of amateur athletics through match-fixing, undue financial influence, and compromised competitive environments.  As the home of a Division I athletic program, the State has a responsibility to ensure that university of Hawaii student-athletes are not placed in casino-affiliated environments. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Prohibit any casino, gambling enterprise, or gambling facility from being located on state lands within or adjacent to the aloha stadium development district or on any lands under the jurisdiction of the stadium authority; and (2)  Ensure that athletic programs of the university of Hawaii do not compete in venues that are operated by or physically integrated with a gambling enterprise while clarifying that standard naming-rights or advertising agreements do not constitute prohibited sponsorships. Furthermore, the legislature intends that this Act shall not be construed as authorizing any form of legalized gambling in the State. SECTION 2.  Chapter 109, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§109-     Prohibition against gambling.  (a) As used in this section: "Casino" means any facility in which gambling occurs. "Gambling" has the same meaning as in section 712-1220. "Gambling enterprise" means any entity whose primary business involves gambling or wagering activities. "Gambling facility" means any structure used primarily for gambling purposes. (b)  The stadium authority shall not authorize, permit, or enter into any agreement allowing the development, construction, operation, or management of any casino, gambling enterprise, or gambling facility on any lands under its jurisdiction. (c)  The stadium authority shall not approve any master development agreement, lease, or sublease that includes gambling activities or contemplates the future establishment of such activities." SECTION 3.  Chapter 206E, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part IX to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§206E-     Casino; gambling; prohibition.  (a) As used in this section: "Casino" means any facility in which gambling occurs. "Gambling" has the same meaning as in section 712-1220. "Gambling enterprise" means any entity whose primary business involves gambling or wagering activities. "Gambling facility" means any structure used primarily for gambling purposes. (b)  No casino, gambling enterprise, or gambling facility shall be developed, constructed, operated, or permitted on any state-owned lands located in the district, including any parcels adjacent to, contiguous with, or functionally integrated into the project area. (c)  No state agency shall enter into, extend, or amend any lease, development agreement, license, or memorandum of understanding that authorizes or contemplates the future establishment of a casino, gambling facility, or gambling enterprise on lands identified in subsection (b)." SECTION 4.  Chapter 304A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§304A-     Competition in gambling-affiliated venues; prohibition.  (a)  As used in this section: "Casino" means any facility in which gambling occurs. "Gambling" has the same meaning as in section 712-1220. "Gambling enterprise" means any entity whose primary business involves gambling or wagering activities. "Gambling facility" means any structure used primarily for gambling purposes. (b) University of Hawaii athletic programs shall not schedule, participate in, or compete in any athletic contest held in the state that is: (1)  A venue that is located within or physically attached to a casino or gambling facility; (2)  A venue that is operated or managed by a gambling enterprise; or (3)  A venue in which gambling activities are conducted. (c)  For the purposes of this section, a standard naming-rights or advertising agreement that is sponsored by a gambling enterprise shall be permitted; provided that the gambling enterprise does not operate or conduct activities at the venue and the venue is not physically integrated with a gambling facility. (d)  The university of Hawaii shall adopt policies and procedures to implement this section." SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________